Idaho, session 2025, H0149.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 31, Title 26, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 26-31-211A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
26-31-211A. CONSUMER PRIVACY IN MORTGAGE APPLICATIONS. (1) For pur-
poses of this section, "mortgage trigger lead" means a consumer report
obtained pursuant to section 604(c)(1)(B) of the fair credit reporting act,
15 U.S.C. 1681b, where the issuance of the report is triggered by an inquiry
made with a consumer reporting agency in response to an application for
credit. "Mortgage trigger lead" does not include a consumer report obtained
by a lender or servicer that holds or services existing indebtedness of the
applicant who is the subject of the report.
(2) With regard to a solicitation of a consumer for a residential mort-
gage loan, as defined in section 26-31-102, Idaho Code, that is based, in
whole or in part, on information contained in a mortgage trigger lead, the
following shall be deemed to be a prohibited act or practice:
(a) The failure to clearly and conspicuously state in the initial phase
of the solicitation that the solicitor is not affiliated with the lender
or broker with which the consumer initially applied;
(b) The failure to clearly and conspicuously state in the initial phase
of the solicitation that the solicitation is based on personal infor-
mation about the consumer that was purchased, directly or indirectly,
from a consumer reporting agency without the knowledge or permission of
the lender or broker with which the consumer initially applied;
(c) The failure, in the initial solicitation, to comply with the provi-
sions of the federal fair credit reporting act relating to prescreening
solicitations that use consumer reports, including the requirement to
make a firm offer of credit to the consumer; or
(d) Knowingly or negligently using information from a mortgage trigger
lead:
(i) To solicit consumers who have opted out of prescreened offers
of credit under the federal fair credit reporting act; or
(ii) To place telephone calls to consumers who have placed their
contact information on a federal or state "do-not-call" list.
(3) A violation of this section shall constitute a violation of the
Idaho consumer protection act.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.